src/fst/stems/interrogatives.lexc
LEXICON Interrogative
jo'+int:jo'     # ; !how?/como
ma+int:ma       # ; !interrogative marker
b'ar+int:b'ar   # ; !where/donde
k'aru+int:k'aru # ; !What/que
ani+int:ani     # ; !who/quien
joq'e+int:joq'e # ; !when/cuando
